Arkansas, session 2025, HB1662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 8, Subchapter 6, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-8-608. Lobbying for covered foreign entity prohibited —— Definition
—— Penalties.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Covered foreign entity" means an individual, foreign
government, or a party other than an individual or foreign government:
(A) On the Consolidated Screening List or Entity List as
designated by the United States Secretary of Commerce;
(B) Domiciled in the People's Republic of China or the
Russian Federation;
(C) Under the influence or control by the government of
*SSS224*
03-19-2025 13:50:15 SSS224

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1662
the People's Republic of China or the Russian Federation; or
(D) That is a subsidiary of an individual, government, or
party referred to in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)-(C) of this section; and
(2) "Under the influence or control" means the People's Republic
of China, the Russian Federation, or an agent of the People's Republic of
China or the Russian Federation is:
(A) Exercising power or authority to regulate decisions
over the covered foreign entity; or
(B) Governing, managing, directing, or otherwise
overseeing decision making for the covered foreign entity.
(b) A person who receives a monetary benefit for lobbying shall not
lobby on behalf of a covered foreign entity.
(c) A person convicted of violating subsection (b) of this section
shall be guilty of:
(1) For the first offense, a violation with a fine of not less
than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than three thousand five hundred
dollars ($3,500);
(2) For the second offense, an unclassified misdemeanor with:
(A) A term of imprisonment not to exceed fix (6) months;
(B) A fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000); or
(C) Both the term of imprisonment and fine under
subdivisions (c)(2)(A) and (B) of this section; and
(3) For the third or subsequent offense, an unclassified felony
with:
(A) A term of imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year;
(B) A fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000); or
(C) Both the term of imprisonment and fine under
subdivisions (c)(3)(A) and (B) of this section.

/s/B. McKenzie






03-19-2025 13:50:15 SSS224